Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5567.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 20. This act shall does not apply to any of the following: (a) A person doing business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the United States relating to banks, savings banks, industrial banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, or credit unions. , nor to any business (b) Business transacted under any a pawnbroker's license. (c) Business transacted pursuant to a license under the earned wage access services act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5558 (request no. H04676'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.